Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB15.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 40 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Accreditation" means the authority granted by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs to representatives, agents, and attorneys to
assist claimants in the preparation, presentation, and prosecution of claims
for United States Department of Veterans Affairs benefits;
(b) "Person" means any natural person, agent, attorney, consulting agent,
consulting firm, consulting business, representative, business trust, estate,
corporation, trust, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture,
public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency or
instrumentality, incorporated or unincorporated association, or any other
legal entity;
(c) "Represent" means the acts associated with representing a claimant in a
proceeding before the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
pursuant to a properly executed and filed:
1. United States Department of Veterans Affairs Form 21-22,
Appointment of Veterans Service Organization as Claimant's
Representative; or
2. United States Department of Veterans Affairs Form 21-22a,
Appointment of Individual as Claimant's Representative; and
(d) "Veterans' benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation, or
prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed an
intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity, function,
status, or entitlement, which pertains to veterans, veterans' dependents or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 985
survivors, or any other individual eligible for United States Department of
Veterans Affairs benefits.
(2) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, aiding, assisting,
counseling, consulting, or representing any individual with any veterans' benefits
matter shall be accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Veterans' Benefits Accreditation Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:38 AM Jacketed